src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-verbs-TV.lexc
LEXICON XTutePX2 !!= * @CODE@ 
+INNAQ+Der/vn:%>%TRUNCtiinnaq tup- ;
+INNAQ+Der/vn+VIK+Der/vn:%>%TRUNCtiinnavik tup- ;
+LLAMMAK+Der/vn:%>llammak Z2-Zmorf ;
+LLAATAA+Der/vn+Sem/Time:%>%TRUNCtillaataa part ; !PL 20180223
+NIARIUTAA+Der/vn+Sem/Time:%>niariutaa part ; !PL 20180223
+NIUTAA+Der/vn+Sem/Time:%>niutaa part ; !PL 20180223
+NIKUQ+Der/vn@U.Num.Pl@:%>nikoq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1Zmorf ;
+NIQ+Der/vn+N+Abs+Sg+Gram/Comp:%>neq K ;
+NIQ@C.Num@+Der/vn:%>neq@C.Num@ tup_speciel ; !specialitet for at haandtere diatese ved NIQ
+NIQ@C.Num@+Der/vn+SSAQ+Der/vn:%>nissaq@C.Num@ tp_speciel ; !specialitet for at haandtere diatese ved NIQ=SSAQ
+NIQ@C.Num@+Der/vn+SSAQ+Der/vn+NNGUAQ+Der/vn:%>nissannguaq@C.Num@   Z1nnguaqZ ; 
+NIRSAQ+Der/vn:%>nersaq Z1Zmorf ;
+PALUK+Der/vn:%>paluk Z2-PZmorf ;
+TUQ@C.Num@+Der/vn:%>toq@C.Num@ Z1Zmorf ;
+USIQ+Der/vn:%>%TRUNCuseq SEQgemin ;
+VIK+Der/vn:%>fik Z2-Zmorf ;
+V+Ind+1Pl+Gram/Refl:%>vugut K_plur ;
+V+Ind+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>vusi K_plur ;
+V+Ind+3Pl+Gram/Refl:%>put K_plur ;
+V+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:%>vassi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:%>vakka K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:%>vatsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+2Sg+3PlO:%>vatit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+3Sg+1PlO:%>vaatigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+3Sg+2PlO:%>vaasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+3Sg+3PlO:%>vai K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:%>vassi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:%>vavut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:%>vagut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:%>vatsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+2Pl+3PlO:%>vasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+3Pl+1PlO:%>vaatigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+3Pl+2PlO:%>vaasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+3Pl+3PlO:%>vaat K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Ind+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Alt:%>vai K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Int+2Sg+Gram/Refl:%>vit K ;
+V+Int+2Sg+1PlO:%>visigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Int+2Sg+3PlO:%>vigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Int+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>visi K ;
+V+Int+2Pl+1PlO:%>visigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Int+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>visigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Int+2Pl+3PlO:%>visigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Int+3Sg+Gram/Refl:%>va K ;
+V+Int+3Pl+Gram/Refl:%>pat K ;
+V+Imp+2Sg+1PlO:%>tigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Imp+2Sg+3PlO:%>%TRUNCtikkit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Imp+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>tigik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Imp+1Pl+3PlO:%>tigit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Imp+2Pl+1PlO:%>tigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Imp+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>sigik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Imp+2Pl+3PlO:%>sigit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+1Sg+2PlO:%>lassi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+1Sg+3PlO:%>lakka K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+1Pl+2PlO:%>lassi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+1Pl+3PlO:%>lavut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+1Pl:%>kisa K; !reciprok
+V+Opt+3Sg+1PlO:%>lisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+3Sg+2PlO:%>lisi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+3Sg+3PlO:%>ligit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+3Pl+1PlO:%>lisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+3Pl+2PlO:%>lisi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>lisigik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Opt+3Pl+3PlO:%>lisigit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+1Sg+Gram/Refl:%>gama K ;
+V+Cau+1Sg+2PlO:%>gassi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+1Sg+3PlO:%>gakkit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+1Sg+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+2Sg+Gram/Refl:%>gavit K ;
+V+Cau+2Sg+1PlO:%>gatsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+2Sg+3PlO:%>gakkit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+2Sg+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Sg+Gram/Refl:%>mat K ;
+V+Cau+3Sg+1PlO:%>matigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Sg+2PlO:%>masi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Sg+3PlO:%>magit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Sg+4PlO:%>matik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+4Sg+Gram/Refl:%>gami K ;
+V+Cau+4Sg+1PlO:%>gamisigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+4Sg+2PlO:%>gamisi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+4Sg+3PlO:%>gamigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+1Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gatta K ;
+V+Cau+1Pl+2PlO:%>gassi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gatsigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+1Pl+3PlO:%>gatsigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+1Pl+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gassi K ;
+V+Cau+2Pl+1PlO:%>gatsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gassigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+2Pl+3PlO:%>gassigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+2Pl+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Pl+Gram/Refl:%>mata K ;
+V+Cau+3Pl+1PlO:%>matigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Pl+2PlO:%>masi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>matigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Pl+3PlO:%>matigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+3Pl+4PlO:%>matik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+4Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gamik K ;
+V+Cau+4Pl+1PlO:%>gamisigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+4Pl+2PlO:%>gamisi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gamikkik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cau+4Pl+3PlO:%>gamikkit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+1Sg+Gram/Refl:%>gaangama K ;
+V+IteCau+1Sg+2PlO:%>gaangassi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+1Sg+3PlO:%>gaangakkit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+1Sg+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+2Sg+Gram/Refl:%>gaangavit K ;
+V+IteCau+2Sg+1PlO:%>gaangatsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+2Sg+3PlO:%>gaangakkit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+2Sg+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Sg+Gram/Refl:%>gaangat K ;
+V+IteCau+3Sg+1PlO:%>gaangatigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Sg+2PlO:%>gaangasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Sg+3PlO:%>gaangagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Sg+4PlO:%>gaangatik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+4Sg+Gram/Refl:%>gaangami K ;
+V+IteCau+4Sg+1PlO:%>gaangamisigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+4Sg+2PlO:%>gaangamisi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+4Sg+3PlO:%>gaangamigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+1Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gaangatta K ;
+V+IteCau+1Pl+2PlO:%>gaangassi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangatsigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+1Pl+3PlO:%>gaangatsigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+1Pl+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gaangassi K ;
+V+IteCau+2Pl+1PlO:%>gaangatsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangassigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+2Pl+3PlO:%>gaangassigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+2Pl+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gaangata K ;
+V+IteCau+3Pl+1PlO:%>gaangatigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Pl+2PlO:%>gaangasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangatigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Pl+3PlO:%>gaangatigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+3Pl+4PlO:%>gaangatik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+4Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gaangamik K ;
+V+IteCau+4Pl+1PlO:%>gaangamisigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+4Pl+2PlO:%>gaangamisi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangamikkik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3PlO:%>gaangamikkit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+1Sg+Gram/Refl:%>guma K ;
+V+Con+1Sg+2PlO:%>gussi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+1Sg+3PlO:%>gukkit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+1Sg+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+2Sg+Gram/Refl:%>guit K ;
+V+Con+2Sg+1PlO:%>gutsigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+2Sg+3PlO:%>gukkit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+2Sg+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Sg+Gram/Refl:%>pat K ;
+V+Con+3Sg+1PlO:%>patigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Sg+2PlO:%>pasi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Sg+3PlO:%>pagit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Sg+4PlO:%>patik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+4Sg+Gram/Refl:%>guni K ;
+V+Con+4Sg+1PlO:%>gunisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+4Sg+2PlO:%>gunisi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+4Sg+3PlO:%>gunigit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+1Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gutta K ;
+V+Con+1Pl+2PlO:%>gussi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gutsigik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+1Pl+3PlO:%>gutsigit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+1Pl+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gussi K ;
+V+Con+2Pl+1PlO:%>gutsigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gussigik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+2Pl+3PlO:%>gussigit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+2Pl+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Pl+Gram/Refl:%>pata K ;
+V+Con+3Pl+1PlO:%>patigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Pl+2PlO:%>pasi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>patigik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Pl+3PlO:%>patigit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+3Pl+4PlO:%>patik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+4Pl+Gram/Refl:%>gunik K ;
+V+Con+4Pl+1PlO:%>gunisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+4Pl+2PlO:%>gunisi K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gunikkik K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Con+4Pl+3PlO:%>gunikkit K_TUQ_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+1PlO:%>luta K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+2PlO:%>lusi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+3PlO:%>lugit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>lutigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+1Pl+3PlO:%>lutigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>lusigik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+2Pl+3PlO:%>lusigit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Cont+1Sg+Gram/Refl:%>lunga K ; !flex-iv
+V+Cont+2Sg+Gram/Refl:%>lutit K ; !flex-iv
+V+Cont+4Sg+Gram/Refl:%>luni K ; !flex-iv
+V+Cont+4Sg+Gram/Refl+TTAAQ:%>lunissaaq # ;
+V+Cont+1Du+Gram/Refl:%>lunuk K ; !flex-iv
+V+Cont+1Pl+Gram/Refl:%>luta K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+Cont+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>lusi K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+Cont+4Pl+Gram/Refl:%>lutik K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+1Sg+Gram/Refl:%>nanga K ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+2Sg+Gram/Refl:%>nak K ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+2Sg+Gram/Refl:%>natit K ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+4Sg+Gram/Refl:%>%ALTINFnani K ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+4Sg+Gram/Refl:%>nani K ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+1Pl+Gram/Refl:%>%ALTINFnata K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+1Pl+Gram/Refl:%>nata K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>%ALTINFnasi K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+Gram/Refl:%>nasi K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+4Pl+Gram/Refl:%>%ALTINFnatik K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+4Pl+Gram/Refl:%>natik K_plur ; !flex-iv
+V+ContNeg+2Sg+1PlO:%>nata K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+4Sg+1PlO:%>nata K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+1PlO:%>nata K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+4Pl+1PlO:%>nata K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+1Sg+2PlO:%>nasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+4Sg+2PlO:%>nasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+1Pl+2PlO:%>nasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+4Pl+2PlO:%>nasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+1Sg+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+1Sg+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+2Sg+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+4Sg+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+1Pl+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+3PlO:%>nasigit K_plur ;
+V+ContNeg+4Pl+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+2Sg+1PlO:%>gitsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Sg+1PlO:%>gaatigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+2Pl+1PlO:%>gitsigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Pl+1PlO:%>gaatigut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+1Sg+2PlO:%>gissi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Sg+2PlO:%>gaasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+1Pl+2PlO:%>gissi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Pl+2PlO:%>gaasi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+1Sg+3PlO:%>gikka K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+2Sg+3PlO:%>gitit K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Sg+3PlO:%>gai K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+4Sg+3PlO:%>gini K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+1Pl+3PlO:%>givut K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+2Pl+3PlO:%>gisi K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Pl+3PlO:%>gaat K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+4Pl+3PlO:%>gitik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+1Sg+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+2Sg+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Sg+4PlO:%>gaatik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+1Pl+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+2Pl+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !XTutePX
+V+Par+3Pl+4PlO:%>gaatik K_plur ; !XTutePX

LEXICON flex-tv_nngit !!= * @CODE@ 
+Gram/TV:    flex-tv_nngit2 ;
+Gram/Refl+Gram/IV: RefleksivNNGIT ;
